Utah statutes.
70C-7-202.   Assignees of creditor.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this title, or unless the assignment is involuntary, any civil action for violation of this title which may be brought against the original creditor in any consumer credit transaction may be maintained against any subsequent assignee of the original creditor where the violation from which the alleged liability arose is apparent on the face of the instrument assigned.

